Utah statutes.
13-43-201.   Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman.

(1)  There is created an Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman in the Department of Commerce.

(2)  The executive director of the Department of Commerce, with the concurrence of the Land Use and Eminent Domain Advisory Board created in Section 13-43-202, shall appoint attorneys with background or expertise in takings, eminent domain, and land use law to fill legal positions within the Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman.

(3)  A person appointed under this section is an exempt employee.

(4)  An attorney appointed under this section is an at-will employee who may be terminated without cause by:

(a)  the executive director of the Department of Commerce; or

(b)  an action of the land Use and Eminent Domain Advisory Board.

